Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1125.01
Director of Administrative Services;
reports and statements required; to whom made.

It shall be
the duty of the Director of Administrative Services to digest, prepare, and
report to the Governor, the Tax Commissioner, and the Clerk of the Legislature,
at least twenty days before the commencement of each regular session of the
Legislature:

(1) A full and detailed statement of the condition of the treasury,
and the amount of the expenditures for the last fiscal year;

(2) A full and detailed statement of the public debt, showing fully
all liabilities and resources of the state; and

(3) Such plans as he or she may deem expedient for (a) the support of
public credit, (b) lessening the public expenses, (c) using the public money
to the best advantage, (d) promoting frugality and economy in public offices,
and generally for the better management and more perfect understanding of
the fiscal affairs of the state, and (e) securing uniformity and efficiency
in the levying and collecting of taxes, systematizing the work to be done
by officers having duties to perform under the revenue law.

The report submitted
to the Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. Each
member of the Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of the
report required by this section by making a request for it to the director.

R.S.1866, c. 4, § 3, p. 19;

R.S.1913, § 5545;

C.S.1922, § 4847;

C.S.1929, § 84-303;

R.S.1943, § 84-303;

Laws 1965, c. 459, § 24, p. 1464;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 51;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 191.